Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE H. DISTRICTS GOVERNING GROUNDWATER

CHAPTER 8853. KENEDY COUNTY GROUNDWATER CONSERVATION DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8853.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the Kenedy County Groundwater Conservation District.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8853.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. (a) The district is a groundwater conservation district in Kenedy County created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(b) The district is a political subdivision of this state.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8853.003. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC USE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8853.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 4, Chapter 1152, Acts of the 78th Legislature, Regular Session, 2003, as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter J or K, Chapter 36, Water Code; or

(2) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes of the district form a closure.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8853.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors.

(b) Directors serve staggered four-year terms.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8853.052. ELECTION OF DIRECTORS. (a) The district is divided into five single-member districts for electing directors.

(b) One director is elected from each single-member district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8853.053. ELECTION DATE. Each even-numbered year, on the uniform election date in May or another date authorized by law, the appropriate number of directors shall be elected.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8853.054. QUALIFICATIONS FOR OFFICE. (a) To be a candidate for or to serve as a director, a person must be a registered voter in the single-member district the person represents or seeks to represent.

(b) A director in office on the effective date of a change in the boundaries of a single-member district under Section 8853.056(a), or a director elected or appointed before the effective date of the change whose term of office begins on or after the effective date of the change, shall serve for the remainder of the director's term in the single-member district to which the director was elected or appointed even though the change in boundaries places the director's residence outside the district to which the director was elected or appointed.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8853.055. APPLICATION FOR PLACEMENT ON BALLOT. A person shall indicate on the application for a place on the ballot the single-member district the person seeks to represent.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8853.056. REVISION OF SINGLE-MEMBER DISTRICTS. (a) After each federal decennial census or as needed, the board may redraw the single-member districts to reflect population changes.

(b) If the district annexes territory, the annexed territory becomes part of one or more of the single-member districts as determined by the board.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

Sec. 8853.057. COMPENSATION OF DIRECTORS. A director is not entitled to fees of office but is entitled to reimbursement of actual expenses reasonably and necessarily incurred while engaging in activities on behalf of the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS

Sec. 8853.101. GROUNDWATER CONSERVATION DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapter 36, Water Code, applicable to groundwater conservation districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8853.151. LIMITATION ON TAXATION. The district may impose a tax to pay any part of bonds or notes issued by the district at a rate not to exceed 20 cents on each $100 of assessed valuation.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (S.B. 1026), Sec. 1.05, eff. April 1, 2015.